Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2312.01
Related by two lines of relationship; single share.

An individual who is related to the decedent through two lines of relationship is entitled to only a single share based on the relationship that would entitle the individual to the larger share.

Laws 2020, LB966, § 11.